apertium-es-ast.ast.dix
    <pardef n="/per__pr">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>per</l>
          <r>per<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>per</l>
          <r>per<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pel</l>
          <r>per<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pela</l>
          <r>per<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pelo</l>
          <r>per<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pelos</l>
          <r>per<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>peles</l>
          <r>per<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/por__pr">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>por</l>
          <r>por<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>por</l>
          <r>por<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pol</l>
          <r>por<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pola</l>
          <r>por<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>polo</l>
          <r>por<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>polos</l>
          <r>por<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>poles</l>
          <r>por<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/en__pr">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>en<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>en</l>
          <r>en<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nel</l>
          <r>en<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r>en<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>no</l>
          <r>en<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nos</l>
          <r>en<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nes</l>
          <r>en<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <!-- Conxunciones -->
    <pardef n="y__cnjcoo">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>y<s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ya</l>
          <r>y<s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>y<s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ni__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ni</l>
          <r>ni<s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>nin</l>
          <r>ni<s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="o__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>o<s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ou</l>
          <r>o<s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pero__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="conque__cnjadv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjadv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>      
    <pardef n="que__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <!-- Relativos Átonos -->
    <pardef n="onde__rel">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="rel"/><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cuant_o__rel">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>u<s n="rel"/><s n="nn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>u<s n="rel"/><s n="nn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>u<s n="rel"/><s n="nn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>u<s n="rel"/><s n="nn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>u<s n="rel"/><s n="nn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="quien__rel">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="rel"/><s n="nn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <!-- Alverbios y Prealverbios-->
    <pardef n="tamién__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bien__preadv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="preadv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Determinantes -->
    <pardef n="to/u__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>u<s n="predet"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>u<s n="predet"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>u<s n="predet"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>u<s n="predet"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>u<s n="predet"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>l</l>
          <r>u<s n="predet"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>u<s n="predet"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lo</l>
          <r>u<s n="predet"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>los</l>
          <r>u<s n="predet"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>les</l>
          <r>u<s n="predet"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e><i>cuando</i><par n="onde__rel"/></e>
    <e><i>como</i><par n="onde__rel"/></e>
    <e r="RL"><i>comu</i><par n="onde__rel"/></e>
    <e><i>cuant</i><par n="cuant_o__rel"/></e>
    <e><i>onde</i><par n="onde__rel"/></e>
    <e r="LR"><i>u</i><par n="onde__rel"/></e>
    <e r="LR"><i>au</i><par n="onde__rel"/></e>
    <e><i>que</i><par n="quien__rel"/></e>
    <e><i>quien</i><par n="quien__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="tou"><i>to</i><par n="to/u__det"/></e>
    <e><i>cuando</i><par n="onde__rel"/></e>
    <e><i>como</i><par n="onde__rel"/></e>
    <e><i>cuant</i><par n="cuant_o__rel"/></e>
    <e><i>onde</i><par n="onde__rel"/></e>
    <e r="LR"><i>u</i><par n="onde__rel"/></e>
    <e r="LR"><i>au</i><par n="onde__rel"/></e>
    <e><i>que</i><par n="quien__rel"/></e>
    <e><i>quien</i><par n="quien__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="tou"><i>to</i><par n="to/u__det"/></e>
    <e lm="y"><i/><par n="y__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ni"><i/><par n="ni__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="o"><i/><par n="o__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="pero"><i>pero</i><par n="pero__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="mas"><i>mas</i><par n="pero__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="que"><i>que</i><par n="que__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="si"><i>si</i><par n="que__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="sinón"><i>sinón</i><par n="pero__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="conque"><i>conque</i><par n="conque__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="de manera que"><i>de<b/>manera<b/>que</i><par n="conque__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="asina que"><i>asina<b/>que</i><par n="conque__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="entós"><i>entós</i><par n="conque__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="sicasí"><i>sicasí</i><par n="conque__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="d'otra miente"><i>d'otra<b/>miente</i><par n="conque__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="por mor"><i>por<b/>mor</i><par n="conque__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="porque"><i>porque</i><par n="conque__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="per aciu"><i>per<b/>aciu</i><par n="conque__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="en"><i/><par n="/en__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="per"><i/><par n="/per__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="por"><i/><par n="/por__pr"/></e>
    <e r="LR"><i>ahí</i><par n="tamién__adv"/></e>
    <e><i>amunchayá</i><par n="tamién__adv"/></e>
    <e><i>arreimente</i><par n="tamién__adv"/></e>
    <e><i>bizarramente</i><par n="tamién__adv"/></e>
    <e><i>dalgo</i><par n="tamién__adv"/></e>
    <e><i>desta</i><par n="tamién__adv"/></e>
    <e><i>entá</i><par n="tamién__adv"/></e>
    <e><i>llueu</i><par n="tamién__adv"/></e>
    <e><i>seguro</i><par n="tamién__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="abondo"><i>abondo</i><par n="bien__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="bien"><i>bien</i><par n="bien__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="casi"><i>casi</i><par n="bien__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="mal"><i>mal</i><par n="bien__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="mui"><i>mui</i><par n="bien__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="bastante"><i>bastante</i><par n="bien__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="tan"><i>tan</i><par n="bien__preadv"/></e>
    <e r="LR" lm="qu'"><p><l>qu'</l><r>que</r></p><par n="que__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="y"><i/><par n="y__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ni"><i/><par n="ni__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="o"><i/><par n="o__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="pero"><i>pero</i><par n="pero__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="mas"><i>mas</i><par n="pero__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="que"><i>que</i><par n="que__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="si"><i>si</i><par n="que__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="sinón"><i>sinón</i><par n="pero__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="magar que"><i>magar<b/>que</i><par n="conque__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="de mou que"><i>de<b/>mou<b/>que</i><par n="conque__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="de mou y manera que"><i>de<b/>mou<b/>y<b/>manera<b/>que</i><par n="conque__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="poro"><i>poro</i><par n="conque__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="asina"><i>asina</i><par n="conque__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="d'esta miente"><i>d'esta<b/>miente</i><par n="conque__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="en"><i/><par n="/en__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="per"><i/><par n="/per__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="por"><i/><par n="/por__pr"/></e>
    <e><i>adelantre</i><par n="tamién__adv"/></e>
    <e><i>apocagüéi</i><par n="tamién__adv"/></e>
    <e><i>cuantayá</i><par n="tamién__adv"/></e>
    <e><i>endayuri</i><par n="tamién__adv"/></e>
    <e><i>namái</i><par n="tamién__adv"/></e>
    <e><i>tempranín</i><par n="tamién__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="abondo"><i>abondo</i><par n="bien__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="bien"><i>bien</i><par n="bien__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="casi"><i>casi</i><par n="bien__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="mal"><i>mal</i><par n="bien__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="mui"><i>mui</i><par n="bien__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="bastante"><i>bastante</i><par n="bien__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="tan"><i>tan</i><par n="bien__preadv"/></e>
    <e r="LR" lm="qu'"><p><l>qu'</l><r>que</r></p><par n="que__cnjsub"/></e>
